Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.574, is amended to read: 144.574 DANGERS OF SHAKING INFANTS AND YOUNG CHILDREN. Subdivision 1. Education by hospitals. (a) A hospital licensed under sections 144.50 to 144.56 shall make available for viewing by the parents of each newborn baby delivered in the hospital a video presentation on the dangers associated with shaking infants and young children. (b) A hospital shall use a video obtained from the commissioner or approved by the commissioner. The commissioner shall provide to a hospital and any interested individuals, at cost, copies of an approved video. The commissioner shall review other video presentations for possible approval upon the request of a hospital. The commissioner shall not require a hospital to use videos that would require the hospital to pay royalties for use of the video, restrict viewing in order to comply with public viewing or other restrictions, or be subject to other costs or restrictions associated with copyrights. (c) new text begin Before a newborn is discharged, new text end a hospital shallnew text begin require at least one of the newborn's parents to view the video and shallnew text end , whenever possible, request both parents to view the video. (d) The showing or distribution of the video shall not subject any person or facility to any action for damages or other relief provided the person or facility acted in good faith. Subd. 2. Education by health care providers. The commissioner shall establish a protocol for health care providers to educate parents and primary caregivers about the dangers associated with shaking infants and young children. deleted text begin The commissioner shall requestdeleted text end new text begin As part of this protocol, the commissioner must identify, approve, and make available to family practice physicians, pediatricians, and other pediatric primary care providers materials for use at well-baby visits to educate parents and primary caregivers about the dangers associated with shaking infants and young children.new text end Family practice physicians, pediatricians, and other pediatric health care providers deleted text begin to review these dangers withdeleted text end new text begin must, at each well-baby visit up to age one, use the protocol and materials to educate new text end the parents and primary caregivers of infants and young children deleted text begin up to the age of three at each well-baby visitdeleted text end new text begin about these dangersnew text end .new text begin The commissioner must review the protocol and materials by July 1, 2031, and at least every five years thereafter to ensure they contain accurate information on essential topics about the dangers of shaking infants and young children, and must update them as needed.new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Periodic review of videos. new text end new text begin Beginning July 1, 2026, and at least every five years thereafter, the commissioner must review the videos provided or approved under subdivision 1 to ensure the videos contain accurate information on essential topics about the dangers of shaking infants and young children. In conducting each review, the commissioner must seek input from individuals and organizations with interest or expertise in preventing the shaking of infants and young children on the topics that must be addressed and the information that must be provided. Following each review, the commissioner must remove from the videos made available to hospitals under subdivision 1 any videos that the commissioner determines do not address all essential topics or do not provide accurate information on these topics. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DANGERS OF SHAKING INFANTS AND YOUNG CHILDREN.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for activities under Minnesota Statutes, section 144.574, including approving and providing educational videos to hospitals and identifying, approving, and making available educational materials to health care providers for use at well-baby visits to educate parents and primary caregivers. new text end